California, session 20252026, SB1092.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known as the Mobilehome Community Stability and Preservation Act.SEC. 2. Section 798.11.1 is added to the Civil Code, to read:798.11.1. “Resident organization” means a group of homeowners who have formed a nonprofit corporation pursuant to Section 23701v of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a cooperative corporation, or other entity or organization. A resident organization may designate an agent to act on its behalf.SEC. 3. Section 798.11.2 is added to the Civil Code, to read:798.11.2. “Qualified entity” means an entity that the Department of Housing and Community Development has certified pursuant to Section 798.83.2.SEC. 4. Section 798.80 of the Civil Code is repealed.SEC. 5. Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 798.83.1) is added to Chapter 2.5 of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code, to read: Article 7.5. Mobilehome Community Stability and Preservation Act798.83.1.(a)If management of a mobilehome park receives an offer for the sale, lease, or transfer of the park that it intends to accept, management shall give at least 240 days’ notice to the following entities before making a final, unconditional acceptance of the offer:798.83.1. (a) No later than 14 days following a triggering event demonstrating management’s intent to sell, as described in subdivision (d), management of a mobilehome park shall give notice to the following entities: (1) To each resident household in the park by first-class certified mail with return receipt requested and by email, if provided by the resident.(2) By first-class certified mail with a return receipt requested and by email, if available, with tracking to all of the following:(A) The mayor of the city in which the mobilehome park is located, or, if located in an unincorporated area, the chair of the board of supervisors of the county.(B) The appropriate local public housing authority, if any.(C) The Department of Housing and Community Development.(D) The officers of a resident organization associated with the mobilehome park.(b) The notice required by subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:(1) A statement expressing the owner’s intent to sell the mobilehome park.(2) A statement detailing the triggering event that required this notice.(c) If the triggering event is the receipt of an offer for the sale or transfer the park that management intends to accept or the conditional acceptance of an offer for the sale or transfer of the park, the notice required by subdivision (a) shall also include all of the following:(1) A statement from management that it has received an offer for the sale, lease, or transfer of the mobilehome park that it intends to accept.(2) A statement of the homeowners’ rights under this article and the deadlines for exercising those rights.(3) (A) A statement of the price, terms, and conditions of any offer management has conditionally accepted or plans to accept concerning the park, or a copy of that offer or purchase contract.(B) In the case of a proposed sale of more than one park, or a park and one or more other nonrelated properties, in a single transaction, the notice shall state both the aggregate price and the price of the park in which the homeowners receiving the notice reside.(d) A triggering event requiring notice under this section includes any time management does any of the following:(1) Signs a contract with a real estate broker or brokerage firm to list the park for sale or to sell or transfer the park.(2) Signs a letter of intent, option to sell or buy, or other conditional written agreement with a potential buyer for the sale or transfer of the park, which includes the estimated price, terms, and conditions of the proposed sale or transfer, even if such price, terms, or conditions are subject to change.(3) Signs a contract with a potential buyer’s real estate broker or brokerage firm related to the potential sale or transfer of the park.(4) Accepts an earnest money promissory note or deposit from a potential buyer for the sale or transfer of the park.(5) Responds to a potential buyer’s due diligence request for the park.(6) Provides a signed property disclosure form for the park to a potential buyer.(7) Lists the park for sale.(8) Receives an offer for the sale or transfer the park that management intends to accept.(9) Conditionally accepts an offer for the sale or transfer of the park.(10) Takes any other action demonstrating an intent to sell the park.798.83.2. (a) (1) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall establish a process for certifying qualified entities that can be designated by a resident organization to operate a mobilehome park and its communal facilities for its remaining useful life.(2) An entity shall be one of the following to be eligible for designation as a qualified entity:(A) Local nonprofit organization or public agency.(B) Regional nonprofit organization or public agency.(C) National nonprofit organization or public agency.(3) The certification process shall be based on an entity’s demonstrated relevant experience in California, as well as its current capacity.(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall maintain and update the list of qualified entities annually.(c) Upon receipt of a notice from management under Section 798.83.1, the Department of Housing and Community Development shall make the list of qualified entities, created pursuant to subdivision (a), available to management.(d) After management receives the list of qualified entities from the Department of Housing and Community Development, it shall send a written copy of the notice it distributed pursuant to Section 798.83.1 to any qualified entity that requests it.798.83.3. (a) (1) No later than 120 days after a notice from management complying with subdivision (c) of Section 798.83.1 is sent, a resident organization or its assignee may deliver a good faith, written purchase agreement offer to management of the park, along with a statement that more than 50 percent of the homeowners in the park support the purchase offer.(2) A homeowner may indicate support for submitting a purchase offer by signing a petition or any other document that so states.(b) If a purchase offer from a resident organization or its assignee is not received by management during the 120-day period provided by this section, management has no further duties under this article for the proposed sale, lease, or transfer of the park.798.83.4. (a) (1) If management receives a written purchase offer, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 798.83.3, management shall consider the purchase offer and negotiate with the resident organization, in good faith, to determine whether a mutual agreement can be reached that results in the resident organization purchasing the park.(2) Management shall make the same information available to a resident organization that it has or would have provided to another prospective purchaser.(3) If management rejects the resident organization’s proposed purchase offer, management shall provide a good faith reason in writing to the resident organization within three days of the date of rejection.(b) If a resident organization or its assignee or agent delivers a proposed purchase agreement in writing to management in compliance with Section 798.83.3, and its proposed purchase agreement matches the price and substantially the same terms and conditions as the offer management has conditionally accepted or plans to accept, the resident organization shall have the right to purchase the park at the price, terms, and conditions stated in its proposed purchase agreement, and this subdivision shall apply rather than subdivision (a). Management shall not unreasonably refuse to enter into or unreasonably delay the execution or closing on a purchase agreement with a resident organization which has proposed a bona fide purchase agreement to meet the price and substantially equivalent terms and conditions of an offer for which notice is required to be given pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 798.83.1.(c) Management shall not reject a proposed purchase agreement solely on the basis of its inclusion of a financing contingency, the type of financing or payment method, or the time period for closing. If a resident organization and management enter into a purchase agreement for the park, the resident organization shall have 120 days from the date of the agreement to arrange all necessary financing, and a commercially reasonable time to close on the sale. If the resident organization fails to arrange all necessary financing during this 120-day period, or a longer period as the parties may agree to, or fails to close on the sale in compliance with the purchase agreement executed by the parties, management has no further duties under this article with respect to the proposed sale, lease, or transfer of the park.798.83.5. (a) A resident organization that has rights under this article may, at its election, assign those rights to the municipality in which the resident organization is located, a housing authority located in the municipality, a state agency, or a qualified entity for the purpose of continuing the use of the property as a park. Upon assignment, the assignee shall be entitled to exercise the rights that this article grants to the assignor resident organization.(b) The resident organization may rescind any rights it has assigned pursuant to subdivision (a) at any time.(c) This section shall not apply if the resident organization represents less than 50 percent of the homeowners of the mobilehome park.798.83.6. (a) Subject to subdivision (b), this article shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A lease of a lot within the park to a person who will live in a manufactured home on that lot.(2) A conveyance of an interest in the park that is incidental to the financing of the park.(3) A sale or transfer pursuant to eminent domain.(4) An initial offer for sale, lease, or transfer from a resident organization that represents at least 50 percent of the homeowners of the mobilehome park.(b) To qualify for an exemption under subdivision (a), a transaction shall not be made in bad faith, shall be made for a legitimate business purpose or a legitimate familial purpose, and shall not be made for the primary purpose of avoiding the opportunity-to-purchase provisions set forth in this article.798.83.7. (a) A resident organization may bring a civil action against management who sells, leases, or transfers a park and fails to comply with this article. Management that violates this article shall be subject to a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or 20 percent of the total sales price, whichever is greater.(b) Actions for relief pursuant to this article may be brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, or by the district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney of the location in which the violation occurred.(c) Any court of competent jurisdiction may grant relief that it finds necessary to enforce this article, including the issuance of an injunction.(d) Lack of knowledge of this article by management shall not be deemed to be a defense to an action under this section.798.83.8. This article shall be liberally interpreted to achieve its purposes of preserving affordable housing and expanding the opportunities for owners of mobilehomes and manufactured homes to purchase the community in which their homes are located.SEC. 6. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.